Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1848
Competitive natural gas providers and aggregators; terms, defined.

For purposes of this section and section 66-1849:

(1) Aggregator means a person who combines retail end users into a group and arranges for the acquisition of competitive natural gas services without taking title to those services; and

(2)(a) Competitive natural gas provider means a person who takes title to natural gas and sells it for consumption by a retail end user. Competitive natural gas provider includes an affiliate of a natural gas public utility.

(b) Competitive natural gas provider does not include the following:

(i) A jurisdictional utility;

(ii) A city-owned or operated natural gas utility or metropolitan utilities district in areas in which it provides natural gas service through pipes it owns; or

(iii) A natural gas public utility that is not subject to the act as provided in section 66-1803 in areas in which it is providing natural gas service in accordance with section 66-1803.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 48.

A metropolitan utilities district that intends to sell natural gas to distribution facilities it does not own falls under the certification provisions of this section and the Public Service Commission's jurisdiction. In re Application of Metropolitan Util. Dist., 270 Neb. 494, 704 N.W.2d 237 (2005).